New York, session 2025-2026, S3738.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 665 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 8 to read as follows: 3 8. Timeliness of financial aid determinations. Notwithstanding any 4 other provision of law, the corporation shall make its determination of 5 financial aid eligibility within sixty days from the day of the receipt 6 of the completed financial aid application from the student. In the 7 event that such financial aid determination is not made by the corpo- 8 ration within sixty days after receipt of the completed financial aid 9 application from the student, such student shall be deemed eligible to 10 receive financial aid for the semester for which the completed financial 11 aid application is made; provided, however, that the corporation may 12 obtain an additional thirty day extension to make its eligibility deter- 13 mination upon written notification to the institution within sixty days 14 that additional time is necessary to examine and review the completed 15 financial aid application of such student. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of July in the second 17 year next succeeding the year in which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07676-01-5